California, session 20252026, SB1336.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 19850 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:19850. Every A person who, either as owner, lessee, or employee, whether for hire or not, either solely or in conjunction with others, deals, operates, carries on, conducts, maintains, or exposes for play any a controlled game in this state, or who receives, directly or indirectly, any compensation or reward, or any percentage or share of the money or property played, for keeping, running, or carrying on any a controlled game in this state, shall apply for and obtain from the commission, and shall thereafter maintain, a valid state gambling license, key employee license, or work permit, as specified set out in this chapter. In any a criminal prosecution for a violation of this section, the punishment shall be as provided in Section 337j of the Penal Code.